Colorado, session 2026A, SB109.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 9-5-101, amend (5.5),
(10), (11), (12), (13), and (14); repeal (5) and (8); and add (2.5) and (4.5)
as follows:
9-5-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 5, unless the context otherwise requires:
(2.5) "ACCESSIBLE STORY" MEANS A STORY ON AN ACCESSIBLE
ROUTE THAT CONTAINS LIVING, SLEEPING, COOKING, BATHING, AND TOILET
FACILITIES AND, IF AVAILABLE IN THE DWELLING UNIT, LAUNDRY FACILITIES.
FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 5, A BASEMENT IS NOT AN "ACCESSIBLE
STORY" IF THE BASEMENT FLOOR IS LOCATED MORE THAN FOUR FEET BELOW
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

THE EXTERIOR FINISHED GRADE, WHICH IS DETERMINED BY ASSESSING THE
VERTICAL DIFFERENCE AT ANY POINT ALONG THE EXPOSED PERIPHERY OF
THE DWELLING UNIT.
(4.5) "DWELLING UNIT" MEANS ANY PORTION OF A BUILDING THAT
CONTAINS LIVING FACILITIES, INCLUDING A ROOM OR ROOMS IN A LIVING
FACILITY THAT HAVE SHARED COOKING, BATHING, TOILET, OR LAUNDRY
FACILITIES SUCH AS DORMITORIES, SHELTERS, ASSISTED LIVING FACILITIES,
AND BOARDING HOMES. "DWELLING UNIT" ALSO MEANS LIVING FACILITIES
THAT INCLUDE PROVISIONS FOR SLEEPING, COOKING, BATHING, AND TOILET
FACILITIES FOR ONE OR MORE PERSONS AND ARE USED FOR EXTENDED STAYS,
SUCH AS TIME-SHARES AND EXTENDED-STAY MOTELS. "DWELLING UNIT"
DOES NOT MEAN A GUEST ROOM IN A MOTEL OR HOTEL.
(5) "Ground story level" means the lowest story in a dwelling unit
containing habitable rooms or areas with an accessible entrance located on
an accessible route that contains living, sleeping, cooking, bathing, and
toilet facilities. For the purposes of this article, a basement shall not be
considered the ground story level if the finished basement floor is located
more than four feet below the exterior finished grade determined at any
point along the exposed periphery of the dwelling unit.
(5.5) "ICC/ANSI A117.1 ICC A117.1" means the "Accessible and
Usable Buildings and Facilities" standard "STANDARD FOR ACCESSIBLE AND
USABLE BUILDINGS AND FACILITIES" 2017 EDITION, or any successor
standard, promulgated and amended from time to time by the international
code council AS ADOPTED BY REFERENCE BY THE BUILDING CODE OF THE
RESPONSIBLE ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(8) "Residential Dwelling unit" means any portion of a building that
contains living facilities, including a room or rooms in a facility that have
shared cooking, bathing, toilet, or laundry facilities such as dormitories,
shelters, assisted living facilities, and boarding homes. "Residential
Dwelling unit" also means facilities that include provisions for sleeping,
cooking, bathing, and toilet facilities for one or more persons and are used
for extended stays, such as time-shares and extended-stay motels.
"Residential Dwelling unit" does not mean a guest room in a motel or hotel.
(10) "Type A dwelling unit" means a dwelling unit designed in
accordance with ICC/ANSI A117.1, section 1002 ICC A117.1 SECTION
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-109

1103, or any successor section within ICC/ANSI A117.1 ICC A117.1.
(11) "Type A multistory dwelling unit" means a multiple-story
dwelling unit with a ground story level designed in accordance with
ICC/ANSI A117.1, section 1002 ICC A117.1 SECTION 1103, or any
successor section within ICC/ANSI A117.1 and, if provided, accessible
laundry facilities on the ground story level ICC A117.1 WHERE THERE IS AT
LEAST ONE ACCESSIBLE STORY THAT CAN BE ACCESSED VIA AN ACCESSIBLE
ROUTE CONNECTED TO AN ACCESSIBLE ENTRANCE.
(12) "Type B dwelling unit" means a dwelling unit with a ground
floor level designed in accordance with ICC/ANSI A117.1, section 1003
ICC A117.1 SECTION 1104, or any successor section within ICC/ANSI
A117.1 ICC A117.1.
(13) "Type B multistory dwelling unit" means a multiple-story
dwelling unit with a ground story level that is designed in accordance with
ICC/ANSI A117.1, section 1003 ICC A117.1 SECTION 1104, or any
successor section within ICC/ANSI A117.1 and, if provided, accessible
laundry facilities on the ground story level ICC A117.1 WHERE THERE IS AT
LEAST ONE ACCESSIBLE STORY THAT CAN BE ACCESSED VIA AN ACCESSIBLE
ROUTE CONNECTED TO AN ACCESSIBLE ENTRANCE.
(14) "Type B visitable ground floor TYPE C VISITABLE DWELLING
UNIT" means a multiple-story dwelling unit with an accessible entrance and
ACCESSIBLE toilet facility designed in accordance with ICC/ANSI A117.1,
section 1003 ICC A117.1 SECTION 1105, or any successor section within
ICC/ANSI A117.1 ICC A117.1.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 9-5-103, amend (1)
and (2); and repeal (3) as follows:
9-5-103. Applicability of standards - enforcement.
(1) The standards and specifications set forth in this article shall
ARTICLE 5 apply to all buildings and facilities used for housing that are
constructed in whole or in part by the use of state, county, or municipal
funds MONEY or the funds MONEY of any political subdivision of the state
or that are constructed with private funds MONEY. All such buildings and
facilities to be constructed from plans on which architectural drawings are
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-109

started after July 1, 1975, from any one of these funds or any combination
thereof shall MUST conform to each of the standards and specifications
prescribed in this article ARTICLE 5. The governmental unit responsible for
the enforcement of this article ARTICLE 5 shall grant exceptions to or modify
any particular standard or specification when it is determined THE
GOVERNMENTAL UNIT RESPONSIBLE FOR ENFORCEMENT DETERMINES that it
is impractical and would create an undue hardship. Any such exception or
modification of the provisions of this article shall ARTICLE 5 MUST be made
in writing as a matter of public record. These standards and specifications
shall be adhered to in those buildings and facilities that are constructed or
proposed on or after April 29, 2003. This article shall apply ARTICLE 5
APPLIES to permanent buildings.
(2) The jurisdiction with responsibility for enforcement of this
article ARTICLE 5 pursuant to section 9-5-104 shall designate a board of
appeals OR OTHER PROCESS to hear and resolve appeals of orders, decisions,
or determinations made by the enforcing agency regarding the application
and interpretation of this article ARTICLE 5.
(3) Any building or facility that would have been subject to this
article 5 but was under construction prior to July 1, 1976, must comply with
the following:
(a) If the walls or defining boundaries of an element or space are
altered, then the altered element or space shall comply with the applicable
provisions of section 9-5-105, unless such alteration is technically
infeasible. If full compliance with this article is technically infeasible,
compliance shall be implemented up to the point of technical infeasibility.
No alteration shall be undertaken that negatively impacts accessibility of a
building or facility pursuant to ICC/ANSI A117.1. This subsection (3)(a)
shall not be construed to require the moving of any existing walls not
otherwise planned to be moved.
(b) Any additions to a building or facility shall be treated as new
construction for the purposes of enforcement of this article.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 9-5-105, amend (1)
and (2)(b) as follows:
9-5-105. Exemptions for certain privately funded projects.
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-109

(1) Accessible dwelling units shall be provided as required in this
article ARTICLE 5; except that this article ARTICLE 5 does not apply to
privately funded projects for the construction of a detached residence
DETACHED RESIDENTIAL DWELLING UNITS or residences or to other types of
residential property containing less than seven residential DWELLING units.
For the purpose of determining the number of accessibility points required
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the accessible dwelling unit types
shall have the following point values:
Accessible dwelling Accessibility point value
unit type: per dwelling unit:
Type A dwelling unit 6
Type A multistory dwelling unit 5
Type B dwelling unit 4
Type B multistory dwelling unit 3
Type B visitable ground floor
TYPE C VISITABLE DWELLING UNIT 1
(2) Residential projects.
(b) A project shall MUST include enough accessible dwelling units
to achieve at least the specified number of accessibility points required
pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS
SECTION.
(I) A project WITH FEWER THAN FIFTY UNITS may use any
combination of accessible dwelling unit types to comply with this section.
(II) AT LEAST TWO PERCENT OF UNITS IN A PROJECT WITH FIFTY OR
MORE UNITS MUST BE ACCESSIBLE DWELLING UNITS AND MUST INCLUDE AT
LEAST ONE UNIT THAT IS EITHER TYPE A, TYPE A MULTISTORY, TYPE B,
TYPE B MULTISTORY, OR TYPE C VISITABLE DWELLING UNIT.
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-109

SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 9-5-106 as
follows:
9-5-106. Implementation plan.
The DEVELOPER OR builder of any project regulated by this article
ARTICLE 5 shall create an implementation plan that guarantees the timely
and evenly phased delivery of the required number of accessible DWELLING
units. Such THE plan shall MUST clearly specify the number and type of
ACCESSIBLE DWELLING units required and the order in which they are to be
completed. Such THE implementation plan shall MUST be subject to
approval by the entity with enforcement authority in such THE project's
jurisdiction. The implementation plan shall not be approved ENTITY WITH
ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY SHALL NOT APPROVE THE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN
if more than thirty percent of the project is intended to be completed
without providing a portion of accessible DWELLING units required by
section 9-5-105; except that, if an undue hardship can be demonstrated, or
other guarantees provided are deemed THE DEVELOPER OR BUILDER CAN
DEMONSTRATE AN UNDUE HARDSHIP OR PROVIDE OTHER GUARANTEES THAT
THE JURISDICTION WITH ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY DEEMS sufficient, the
jurisdiction having responsibility for enforcement may grant exceptions to
this requirement. The implementation plan shall MUST be approved by the
governmental unit responsible for enforcement before a building permit is
issued.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-109

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-109